Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2013.01
Passenger tire equivalent of waste tires, defined.

Passenger tire equivalent of waste tires means twenty pounds of waste tire or processed waste tire.

Laws 2003, LB 143, § 3.